Ohio, session 136, HB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3373.01, 3373.02, and 3373.03 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3373.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Middle or high school" means any of the following that offers any of grades seven through twelve: (1) A school operated by a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (2) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (3) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (4) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (5) A chartered nonpublic school; (6) A nonchartered nonpublic school that is a member of an organization that regulates interscholastic athletic conferences or events. (B) "Middle or high school student-athlete" means an individual who participates in athletic competitions or events administered by an organization that regulates interscholastic athletic conferences or events and to whom either of the following apply: (1) The student is enrolled in middle or high school. (2) The student is participating in interscholastic athletics at a middle or high school in accordance with section 3313.536, 3313.537, 3313.5311, 3313.5312, or 3313.5313 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3373.02. No middle or high school, school district, interscholastic athletic conference, or organization that regulates interscholastic athletic conferences or events shall permit a middle or high school student-athlete to do either of the following: (A) Earn compensation from the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness if that compensation is earned in connection with the student-athlete's participation in interscholastic athletics; (B) Earn any other compensation related to the student-athlete's position on the roster of an interscholastic athletics team. Sec. 3373.03. (A) If a middle or high school student-athlete earns compensation that is prohibited under section 3373.02 of the Revised Code, no middle or high school, school district, interscholastic athletic conference, or organization that regulates interscholastic athletic conferences or events shall permit the student-athlete to participate in interscholastic athletics in the specific sport to which the compensation relates. Nothing in this division prohibits that student-athlete from participating in interscholastic athletics in a sport to which the compensation does not relate. (B) Each organization that regulates interscholastic athletic conferences or events shall adopt rules or bylaws to implement division (A) of this section. The organization shall include in the rules or bylaws both of the following: (1) A procedure to investigate any allegation that a middle or high school student-athlete has earned compensation that is prohibited under section 3373.02 of the Revised Code and to make a determination regarding the allegation; (2) A procedure for a student-athlete to appeal an adverse determination to the organization's executive officer for reinstatement to participate in interscholastic athletics in the sport to which the compensation is related.